Washington statutes.
RCW 43.155.140

Projects in areas impacted by the closure or potential closure of large coal-fired electric generation facilities.

The board shall solicit qualifying projects to plan, design, and construct public works projects needed to attract new industrial and commercial activities in areas impacted by the closure or potential closure of large coal-fired electric generation facilities, which for the purposes of this section means a facility that emitted more than one million tons of greenhouse gases in any calendar year prior to 2008. The projects should be consistent with any applicable plans for major industrial activity on lands formerly used or designated for surface coal mining and supporting uses under RCW 36.70A.368. When the board receives timely and eligible project applications from a political subdivision of the state for financial assistance for such projects, the board from available funds shall give priority consideration to such projects.

[ 2011 c 180 s 302.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—2011 c 180: See note following RCW 80.80.010.